Alabama, session 2026rs, HB624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 1 of Act 2006-370, 2006 Regular
Session, is amended to read as follows:
"Section 1. (a) A special recording fee of five dollars
($5) ten dollars ($10) shall be collected by the Judge of
Probate of Wilcox County, with respect to each real property
instrument and each personal property instrument that may be
filed for record in the office of the judge of probate and for
the recording of other instruments and documents in the
probate office in the discretion of the governing body of the
county, and no.
(b) No such instrument shall be received for record in
the office of the judge of probate unless the special
recording fee of five dollars ($5) ten dollars ($10) is paid
thereon.
(c) The special recording fee shall be in addition to
all other fees, taxes, and other charges required by law to be
paid upon the filing for record of any real property
instrument or personal property instrument, and for the
recording of other instruments and documents in the probate
office in the discretion of the governing body of the county.
Page 1

office in the discretion of the governing body of the county.
HB624 Enrolled
Section 2. Act 1990-618, 1990 Regular Session (Acts
1990, p. 618) and Act 2001-365, 2001 Regular Session, relating
to probate recording fees, are repealed.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 2

2026.
HB624 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 31-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 02-Apr-26 Passed



Page 3